Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-134, as


last amended by Section 6, Chapter 323, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 3-134), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3-134. A. For written applications filed after July 1,


2024, prior to submission of the application to a proposed sponsor


seeking to establish a charter school or to the Statewide Charter


School Board to establish a virtual charter school, the applicant

Req. No. 3047 Page 1


shall be required to complete training which shall not exceed ten


(10) hours provided by the Statewide Charter School Board on the


process and requirements for establishing a charter school or


virtual charter school. The sponsor of a charter school that enters


into a new or renewed sponsorship contract on or after July 1, 2024,


shall be required to complete training provided by the Statewide


Charter School Board or an organization approved by the Statewide


Charter School Board on the oversight duties of the sponsor. The


Board shall develop and implement the training and publish a list of


organizations approved to provide training by July 1, 2024. The


Board and organizations approved by the Board may provide the


training in any format and manner determined to be efficient and


effective including, but not limited to, web-based training.


B. Except as otherwise provided for in Section 3-137 of this


title, an applicant seeking to establish a virtual charter school


shall submit a written application to the Statewide Charter School


Board, and an applicant seeking to establish a charter school shall


submit a written application to the proposed sponsor as provided for


in subsection E of this section. The application shall include:


1. A mission statement for the charter school or virtual


charter school;


2. A description including, but not limited to, background


information of the organizational structure and the governing board


of the charter school or virtual charter school;

Req. No. 3047 Page 2


3. A financial plan for the first five (5) years of operation


of the charter school or virtual charter school and a description of


the treasurer or other officers or persons who shall have primary


responsibility for the finances of the charter school or virtual


charter school. Such person shall have demonstrated experience in


school finance or the equivalent thereof;


4. A description of the hiring policy of the charter school or


virtual charter school;


5. The name of the applicant or applicants and requested


sponsor;


6. A description of the facility and location of the charter


school;


7. A description of the grades being served;


8. An outline of criteria designed to measure the effectiveness


of the charter school or virtual charter school;


9. Documentation that the applicants completed training as set


forth in subsection A of this section;


10. A description of the minimum and maximum enrollment planned


per year for each term of the charter contract;


11. The proposed calendar for the charter school or virtual


charter school and sample daily schedule;


12. Unless otherwise authorized by law or regulation, a


description of the academic program aligned with state standards;



Req. No. 3047 Page 3


13. A description of the instructional design of the charter


school or virtual charter school including the type of learning


environment, class size and structure, curriculum overview, and


teaching methods;


14. The plan for using internal and external assessments to


measure and report student progress on the performance framework


developed by the applicant in accordance with Section 3-136 of this


title;


15. The plans for identifying and successfully serving students


with disabilities, students who are English language learners, and


students who are academically behind;


16. A description of cocurricular or extracurricular programs


and how they will be funded and delivered;


17. Plans and time lines timelines for student recruitment and


enrollment including lottery procedures;


18. The student discipline policies for the charter school or


virtual charter school including those for special education


students with disabilities;


19. An organizational chart that clearly presents the


organizational structure of the charter school or virtual charter


school, including lines of authority and reporting between the


governing board, staff, any related bodies such as advisory bodies


or parent and teacher councils, and any external organizations that


will play a role in managing the school;

Req. No. 3047 Page 4


20. A clear description of the roles and responsibilities for


the governing board, the leadership and management team for the


charter school or virtual charter school, and any other entities


shown in the organizational chart;


21. The leadership and teacher employment policies for the


charter school or virtual charter school;


22. Proposed governing bylaws;


23. Explanations of any partnerships or contractual


partnerships central to the operations or mission of the charter


school or virtual charter school;


24. The plans for providing transportation, food service, and


all other significant operational or ancillary services;


25. Opportunities and expectations for parental involvement;


26. A detailed school start-up plan that identifies tasks, time


lines timelines, and responsible individuals;


27. A description of the financial plan and policies for the


charter school or virtual charter school including financial


controls and audit requirements;


28. A description of the insurance coverage the charter school


or virtual charter school will obtain;


29. Start-up and five-year budgets with clearly stated


assumptions;


30. Start-up and first-year cash-flow projections with clearly


stated assumptions;

Req. No. 3047 Page 5


31. Evidence of anticipated fundraising contributions, if


claimed in the application;


32. A sound facilities plan including backup or contingency


plans if appropriate;


33. A requirement that the charter school or virtual charter


school governing board meet no fewer than ten (10) months of the


year in the state and that for those charter schools outside of


counties with a population of five hundred thousand (500,000) or


more, that a minimum of two (2) members are residents within the


geographic boundary of the charter school;


34. A requirement that the charter school or virtual charter


school follow the requirements of the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and


Oklahoma Open Records Act. Additionally, a charter school or


virtual charter school shall:


a. include a designated public comment period during


every regular meeting of the charter school or virtual


charter school governing board,


b. post on its website procedures for how the charter


school or virtual charter school responds to requests


under the Oklahoma Open Records Act, and


c. submit an annual report to its sponsor regarding


compliance with the provisions of this paragraph; and


35. A copy of any proposed contract between the governing board


of a charter school or virtual charter school and an educational

Req. No. 3047 Page 6


management organization, as defined by Section 5-200 of this title,


which meets the requirements of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act.


C. A board of education of a public school district, public


body, public or private college or university, private person, or


private organization may contract with a sponsor to establish a


charter school or virtual charter school. A private school shall


not be eligible to contract for a charter school or virtual charter


school under the provisions of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act.


D. The sponsor of a charter school is the board of education of


a school district, a higher education institution, a private


institution of higher learning accredited pursuant to Section 4103


of this title, a federally recognized Indian tribe which meets the


criteria established in Section 3-132 of this title, or beginning


July 1, 2024, the Statewide Charter School Board. Any sponsor


authorized pursuant to subsection A of Section 3-132 of this title


may sponsor one or more charter schools. The physical location of a


charter school sponsored by a board of education of a school


district shall be within the boundaries of the sponsoring school


district. The physical location of a charter school sponsored by


the Statewide Charter School Board pursuant to paragraph 6 of


subsection A of Section 3-132 of this title shall be in the school


district in which the application originated.


E. 1. Beginning July 1, 2024, any application seeking to


establish a charter school in this state shall be submitted first to

Req. No. 3047 Page 7


the school district in which the proposed charter school is to be


located. The school district board of education shall approve or


deny the application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the


application. If the charter school application is denied, nothing


shall prohibit an applicant from submitting a revised application to


the school district board of education, which shall approve or deny


the revised application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the


application.


2. An applicant for a charter school that has been denied


pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection may submit an application


to a proposed sponsor listed in paragraphs 2 through 6 of subsection


A of Section 3-132 of this title, which shall either accept or


reject sponsorship of the charter school within ninety (90) days of


receipt of the application. If the proposed sponsor rejects the


application, it shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons


for the rejection. The applicant may submit a revised application


for reconsideration to the proposed sponsor within thirty (30) days


after receiving notification of the rejection. The proposed sponsor


shall accept or reject the revised application within thirty (30)


days of its receipt.


3. Beginning July 1, 2024, an applicant for a virtual charter


school shall submit an application to the Statewide Charter School


Board, which shall either accept or reject sponsorship of the


virtual charter school within ninety (90) days of receipt of the

Req. No. 3047 Page 8


application. If the application is rejected, the Statewide Charter


School Board shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons


for the rejection. The applicant may submit a revised application


for reconsideration to the Statewide Charter school School Board


within thirty (30) days after receiving notification of the


rejection. The Statewide Charter School Board shall accept or


reject the revised application within thirty (30) days of its


receipt.


F. A board of education of a school district, a higher


education institution, a private institution of higher learning


accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this title, or a federally


recognized Indian tribe shall notify the State Board of Education


and the Statewide Charter School Board when it accepts sponsorship


of a charter school. The notification shall include a copy of the


charter of the charter school.


G. Applicants for charter schools and virtual charter schools


proposed to be sponsored by the Statewide Charter School Board may,


upon rejection of a revised application, proceed to binding


arbitration under the commercial rules of the American Arbitration


Association with costs of the arbitration to be borne by the


applicant.


H. If a board of education of a school district, a higher


education institution, a private institution of higher learning


accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this title, or a federally

Req. No. 3047 Page 9


recognized Indian tribe accepts sponsorship of a charter school, the


administrative, fiscal, and oversight responsibilities of the school


district, the higher education institution, the private institution


of higher learning accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this


title, or the federally recognized Indian tribe shall be listed in


the contract. No administrative, fiscal, or oversight


responsibilities of a charter school shall be delegated to a school


district unless the school district agrees to enter into a contract


to assume the responsibilities.


I. A sponsor of a public charter school shall have the


following powers and duties over charter schools it sponsors, and


the Statewide Charter School Board shall have the following powers


and duties over the charter schools and virtual charter schools it


sponsors:


1. Provide services and oversight of the operations of charter


schools or virtual charter schools in the state through annual


oversight and performance reviews and reauthorization. The results


of the annual oversight and performance review of a charter school


or virtual charter school shall be provided to its governing board


and posted on the sponsor’s website. The annual oversight and


performance review shall include:


a. an evaluation of the charter school’s or virtual


charter school’s academic, operational, and financial


performance,

Req. No. 3047 Page 10


b. an annual performance evaluation of the charter school


or virtual charter school superintendent or


administrator, and


c. administration of an anonymous annual climate and


satisfaction survey of parents and legal guardians of


students enrolled in the charter school or virtual


charter school;


2. Solicit and evaluate charter applications;


3. Approve quality charter applications that meet identified


educational needs and promote a diversity of educational choices;


4. Decline to approve weak or inadequate charter applications;


5. Negotiate and execute sound charter contracts with each


approved public charter school or virtual charter school;


6. Approve or deny proposed contracts between the governing


board of a charter school or virtual charter school and an


educational management organization, as defined by section Section


5-200 of this title;


7. Monitor, in accordance with charter contract terms, the


performance and legal compliance of charter schools and virtual


charter schools; and


8. Determine whether each charter contract merits renewal,


nonrenewal, or revocation.


J. Sponsors shall establish a procedure for accepting,


approving, and disapproving charter school applications in

Req. No. 3047 Page 11


accordance with subsection E of this section. The Statewide Charter


School Board shall post its application, application process, and


application time frames on the Board’s website.


K. Sponsors including the Statewide Charter School Board shall


develop and maintain chartering policies and practices consistent


with recognized principles and standards for quality charter


sponsoring in all major areas of sponsoring responsibility including


organizational capacity and infrastructure, soliciting and


evaluating charter school and virtual charter school applications,


performance contracting, ongoing charter school and virtual charter


school oversight and evaluation, and charter contract renewal


decision-making.


L. Sponsors acting in their official capacity shall be immune


from civil and criminal liability with respect to all activities


related to a charter school with which they contract.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-137, as


amended by Section 8, Chapter 323, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 3-137), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3-137. A. An initial contract between a charter school


or virtual charter school and its sponsor approved on or after July


1, 2024, shall be effective for five (5) years from the first day of


operation. After completing an initial five-year term, a charter


contract may be renewed for up to ten-year terms of duration,


although the sponsor may vary the term based on the performance,

Req. No. 3047 Page 12


demonstrated capacities, and particular circumstances of each


charter school or virtual charter school. A sponsor may grant


renewal with specific conditions for necessary improvements to a


charter school or virtual charter school.


B. Prior to the beginning of the final year of the contract


term of a charter school or virtual charter school, the sponsor


shall issue a performance report and charter renewal application


guidance to the charter school and its governing board or the


virtual charter school and its governing board. The performance


report shall summarize the performance record to date of the charter


school or virtual charter school based on the data required by the


Oklahoma Charter Schools Act, the annual performance framework


evaluation, the annual oversight and performance review conducted


pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection I of Section 3-134 of this


title, a review of the contract with an educational management


organization if the charter school or virtual charter school


contracts with an educational management organization, and a review


of the charter contract including the charter school’s or virtual


charter school’s compliance with the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, the


Oklahoma Open Records Act, and other requirements of paragraph 34 of


subsection B of Section 3-134 of this title. The performance review


shall take into consideration the percentage of at-risk students


enrolled in the charter school or virtual charter school. The


performance report shall provide notice of any weaknesses, concerns,

Req. No. 3047 Page 13


violations, or deficiencies perceived by the sponsor concerning the


charter school or virtual charter school that may jeopardize its


position in seeking renewal if not timely rectified. If there are


weaknesses, concerns, violations, or deficiencies the sponsor may


require a charter school or virtual charter school to develop a


corrective action plan and corresponding timeline to remedy any


weaknesses, concerns, violations, or deficiencies. If the sponsor


requires a corrective action plan, the charter school or virtual


charter school shall have forty-five (45) days to respond to the


performance report and submit any corrections or clarifications for


the report. If the charter school or virtual charter school does


not substantially complete the corrective action plan, the sponsor


may choose to revoke or not renew the charter contract pursuant to


the requirements of this section.


C. 1. Prior to the beginning of the final year of a charter


contract term, the charter school or virtual charter school may


apply for renewal of the contract with the sponsor including the


Statewide Charter School Board. The renewal application guidance


shall, at a minimum, provide an opportunity for the charter school


or virtual charter school to:


a. present additional evidence, beyond the data contained


in the performance report, supporting its case for


charter renewal,



Req. No. 3047 Page 14


b. describe improvements undertaken or planned for the


school, and


c. detail the plan for the next charter term for the


school.


2. The renewal application guidance shall include or refer


explicitly to the criteria that will guide the renewal decisions of


the sponsor, which shall be based on the performance framework set


forth in the charter contract and consistent with the Oklahoma


Charter Schools Act.


D. The sponsor may deny the request for renewal if it


determines the charter school or virtual charter school has failed


to complete the obligations of the contract or comply with the


provisions of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act. A sponsor shall


give written notice of its intent to deny the request for renewal at


least eight (8) months prior to expiration of the contract. In


making charter renewal decisions, a sponsor shall:


1. Ground decisions on evidence of the performance of the


charter school or virtual charter school over the term of the


charter contract in accordance with the performance framework set


forth in the charter contract and shall take into consideration the


percentage of at-risk students enrolled in the school;


2. Grant renewal to charter schools or virtual charter schools


that have achieved the standards, targets, and performance


expectations as stated in the charter contract and are

Req. No. 3047 Page 15


organizationally and fiscally viable and have been faithful to the


terms of the contract and applicable law;


3. Ensure that data used in making renewal decisions are


available to the school and the public; and


4. Provide a public report summarizing the evidence used as the


basis for each decision.


E. If the Statewide Charter School Board denies a request for


renewal, the Board may, if requested by the charter school or


virtual charter school, proceed to binding arbitration as provided


for in subsection G of Section 3-134 of this title.


F. A sponsor may terminate a contract during the term of the


contract for failure to meet the requirements for student


performance contained in the contract and performance framework,


failure to meet the standards of fiscal management, violations of


the law, or other good cause. The sponsor shall give at least


ninety (90) days’ written notice to the governing board of the


charter school or virtual charter school prior to terminating the


contract. The governing board may request, in writing, an informal


hearing before the sponsor within fourteen (14) days of receiving


notice. The sponsor shall conduct an informal hearing before taking


action.


G. Beginning July 1, 2024, and subject to the provisions of


this section, a charter school sponsor authorized by subsection A of


Section 3-132 of this title with a charter contract that includes

Req. No. 3047 Page 16


more than one charter school site may terminate or not renew a


charter school contract for a specific charter school site.


H. 1. Beginning in the 2016-2017 school year, the State Board


of Education shall identify charter schools and virtual charter


schools in the state that are ranked in the bottom five percent (5%)


of all public schools as determined pursuant to Section 1210.545 of


this title.


2. At the time of its charter renewal, based on an average of


the current year and the two (2) prior operating years, a sponsor


may close a charter school site or virtual charter school identified


as being among the bottom five percent (5%) of public schools in the


state. The average of the current year and two (2) prior operating


years shall be calculated by using the percentage ranking for each


year divided by three, as determined by this subsection.


3. If there is a change to the calculation described in Section


1210.545 of this title that results in a charter school site or


virtual charter school that was not ranked in the bottom five


percent (5%) being ranked in the bottom five percent (5%), then the


sponsor shall use the higher of the two rankings to calculate the


ranking of the charter school site or virtual charter school.


4. A charter school or virtual charter school that is closed by


its sponsor pursuant to this subsection shall not be granted a


subsequent charter contract.



Req. No. 3047 Page 17


5. The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to a


charter school or virtual charter school that has been designated by


the State Department of Education as implementing an alternative


education program.


6. In making a charter school site or virtual charter school


closure decision, the sponsor shall consider the following:


a. enrollment of students with special challenges such as


drug or alcohol addiction, prior withdrawal from


school, prior incarceration, or other special


circumstances,


b. high mobility of the student population resulting from


the specific purpose of the charter school or virtual


charter school,


c. annual improvement in the performance of students


enrolled in the charter school or virtual charter


school compared with the performance of students


enrolled in the charter school or virtual charter


school in the immediately preceding school year, and


d. whether a majority of students attending the charter


school or virtual charter school under consideration


for closure would likely revert to attending public


schools with lower academic achievement, as


demonstrated pursuant to Section 1210.545 of this


title.

Req. No. 3047 Page 18


7. If at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the charter schools


chartered by one sponsor are closed within a five-year period


pursuant to this subsection, the authority of the sponsor to sponsor


new charter schools may be suspended by the Statewide Charter School


Board until the Board approves the sponsor to sponsor new charter


schools. A determination made pursuant to this paragraph shall


identify the deficiencies that, if corrected, will result in the


approval of the sponsor to sponsor new charter schools.


I. If a sponsor fails to conduct the annual oversight and


performance review pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection I of


Section 3-134 of this title or fails to review a charter school’s


compliance with the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, the Oklahoma Open


Records Act, and other requirements of paragraph 34 of subsection B


of Section 3-134 of this title, the authority of the sponsor to


sponsor new charter schools may be suspended by the Statewide


Charter School Board until the Board approves the sponsor to sponsor


new charter schools. A determination made pursuant to this


subsection shall identify the deficiencies that, if corrected, will


result in the approval of the sponsor to sponsor new charter


schools.


J. If a sponsor terminates a contract or the charter school or


virtual charter school is closed, the closure shall be conducted in


accordance with the following protocol:



Req. No. 3047 Page 19


1. Within two (2) calendar weeks of a final closure


determination, the sponsor shall meet with the governing board and


leadership of the charter school or virtual charter school to


establish a transition team composed of school staff, applicant


staff, and others designated by the applicant that will attend to


the closure including the transfer of students, student records, and


school funds;


2. The sponsor and transition team shall communicate regularly


and effectively with families of students enrolled in the charter


school or virtual charter school, as well as with school staff and


other stakeholders, to keep them apprised of key information


regarding the closure of the school and their options and risks;


3. The sponsor and transition team shall ensure that current


instruction of students enrolled in the charter school or virtual


charter school continues per the charter contract for the remainder


of the school year;


4. The sponsor and transition team shall ensure that all


necessary and prudent notifications are issued to agencies,


employees, insurers, contractors, creditors, debtors, and management


organizations; and


5. The governing board of the charter school or virtual charter


school shall continue to meet as necessary to take actions needed to


wind down school operations, manage school finances, allocate


resources, and facilitate all aspects of closure.

Req. No. 3047 Page 20


J. K. A sponsor including the Statewide Charter School Board


shall develop revocation and nonrenewal processes that are


consistent with the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act and that:


1. Provide the charter school or virtual charter school with a


timely notification of the prospect of revocation or nonrenewal and


of the reasons for possible closure;


2. Allow the charter school or virtual charter school a


reasonable amount of time in which to prepare a response;


3. Provide the charter school or virtual charter school with an


opportunity to submit documents and give testimony in a public


hearing challenging the rationale for closure and in support of the


continuation of the school at an orderly proceeding held for that


purpose and prior to taking any final nonrenewal or revocation


decision related to the school;


4. Allow the charter school or virtual charter school access to


representation by counsel to call witnesses on its behalf;


5. Permit the recording of the proceedings; and


6. After a reasonable period for deliberation, require a final


determination be made and conveyed in writing to the charter school


or virtual charter school.


K. L. If a sponsor revokes or does not renew a charter


contract, the sponsor shall clearly state in a resolution the


reasons for the revocation or nonrenewal. If a charter is revoked



Req. No. 3047 Page 21


or nonrenewed, the charter school or virtual charter school shall


disclose the revocation or nonrenewal in any subsequent application.


L. M. If a charter contract is not renewed, the governing board


of the charter school may submit an application to a proposed new


sponsor as provided for in Section 3-134 of this title.


M. N. If a charter contract is not renewed or is terminated


according to this section, a student who attended the charter school


or virtual charter school may enroll in the resident school district


of the student or may apply for a transfer in accordance with the


Education Open Transfer Act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3047 EB 12/31/2025 4:01:55 PM















Req. No. 3047 Page 22